Alaska, session 34, HB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 09.10.070(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, a person may not bring an action (1) 06 for libel, slander, assault, battery, seduction, or false imprisonment; [,] (2) for personal 07 injury or death, or injury to the rights of another not arising on contract and not 08 specifically provided otherwise; (3) for taking, detaining, or injuring personal 09 property, including an action for its specific recovery; (4) upon a statute for a 10 forfeiture or penalty to the state; [OR] (5) upon a liability created by statute, other than 11 a penalty or forfeiture; or (6) for interference or attempted interference with, or 12 deprivation of, a right, privilege, or immunity under AS 09.65.360; unless the 13 action is commenced within two years of the accrual of the cause of action. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 09.65 is amended by adding a new section to read: 01 Sec. 09.65.360. Liability for deprivation or interference with a 02 constitutional right. (a) A person who has been deprived of a right, privilege, or 03 immunity secured by the United States Constitution or the Constitution of the State of 04 Alaska, or a person whose exercise or enjoyment of a right, privilege, or immunity has 05 been interfered with or attempted to be interfered with by a federal official acting 06 under color of law, may bring a civil action for damages and for injunctive or other 07 appropriate relief. 08 (b) A court of this state has jurisdiction under AS 09.05.015(a) over the 09 subject matter of an action brought under this section and a person who is served in 10 that action according to the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. An action brought under 11 this section must be filed in the superior court. 12 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 APPLICABILITY: This Act applies to actions that are filed in a court of this state on 15 or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.